zh-CN: 礼盒/铁罐内衬类型: 瓶颈内托; 隔板（纸板）; 隔板（塑料）; 布料内衬; 泡沫内托; 模压纸浆内托; 无内托; 包含碎纸/填充物; 托盘内托; 其他
vi: Loại khay/vật liệu lót bên trong hộp quà: Lót cổ chai; Vách ngăn (bìa cứng); Vách ngăn (nhựa); Lớp lót vải; Lót xốp; Lót bột giấy đúc; Không có lớp lót; Có kèm giấy vụn/giấy chèn; Khay lót; Khác
de: Art der Einlage für Geschenkbox/-dose: Flaschenhalseinsatz; Trennwand (Karton); Trennwand (Kunststoff); Stoffauskleidung; Schaumstoffeinsatz; Faserguss-Einsatz; Ohne Einsatz; Papierschnitzel/Füllmaterial inbegriffen; Schalen-Einsatz; Sonstige
ko: 기프트 박스/틴 내부 인서트 유형: 병목 인서트; 칸막이(판지); 칸막이(플라스틱); 패브릭 안감; 폼 인서트; 성형 펄프 인서트; 인서트 없음; 종이 조각/충전재 포함; 트레이 인서트; 기타
bg-BG: Тип вътрешна вложка за подаръчна кутия/кутия от метал: Вложка за гърло на бутилка; Разделител (картон); Разделител (пластмаса); Текстилна подплата; Вложка от пяна; Вложка от формована целулоза; Без вложка; Включен пълнеж/нарязана хартия; Вложка тип тавичка; Друго
hr-HR: darivanje box/identifikacijski broj poreznog obveznika insert type: Umetak za grlo boce; Pregrada (karton); Pregrada (plastika); Podstava od tkanine; Umetak od pjene; Umetak od prešane celuloze; Bez umetka; Uključene papirnate trakice / punilo; Umetak u obliku plitice; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ vložky do darčekovej škatule/plechovky: Vložka na hrdlo fľaše; Oddeľovač (kartónový); Oddeľovač (plastový); Látková výstelka; Penová vložka; Vložka z tvarovanej celulózy; Bez vložky; Vrátane papierovej drviny/výplne; Tácková vložka; Iné
ja: ギフトボックス／缶挿入タイプ: ボトルネックインサート; 仕切り (段ボール); 仕切り (プラスチック); ファブリックライニング; フォームインサート; モールドパルプインサート; インサートなし; ペーパーシュレッド/緩衝材入り; トレイインサート; その他
cs: Typ vložky do dárkové krabice/plechovky: Vložka na hrdlo lahve; Oddělovač (kartonový); Oddělovač (plastový); Látková podšívka; Pěnová vložka; Vložka z nasávané kartonáže; Bez vložky; Včetně papírové drtě / výplně; Vložka s přihrádkami; Ostatní
zh-TW: 禮盒/鐵盒內襯類型: 瓶頸嵌件; 隔板 (硬紙板); 隔板 (塑膠); 布料內襯; 泡棉嵌件; 模壓紙漿嵌件; 無嵌件; 內含碎紙/填充物; 托盤嵌件; 其他
es: Tipo de inserto de caja o lata de regalo: Inserto para cuello de botella; Divisor (cartón); Divisor (plástico); Forro de tela; Inserto de espuma; Inserto de pulpa moldeada; Sin inserto; Tiras de papel/Relleno incluido; Inserto de bandeja; Otro
nb: Gaveutdelingsboks/organisasjonsnummer innstikktype: Flaskehalsinnlegg; Skillevegg (papp); Skillevegg (plast); Stoffôr; Skuminnlegg; Støpt pappinnlegg; Ingen innlegg; Papirstrimler/fyllmateriale inkludert; Brettinnlegg; Annet
nl: Inzettype voor geschenkdoos/blik: Flessenhalsinlay; Verdeler (karton); Verdeler (plastic); Stoffen voering; Schuiminlay; Gevormde pulpinlay; Geen inlay; Papiersnippers/vulmateriaal inbegrepen; Trayinlay; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de inserção para caixas de presente/latas: Encaixe para gargalo de garrafa; Divisória (cartão); Divisória (plástico); Revestimento em tecido; Encaixe em espuma; Encaixe em polpa moldada; Sem encaixe; Tiras de papel/enchimento incluído; Encaixe tipo bandeja; Outro
lt-LT: Dovanų dėžutės / skardinės įdėklo tipas: Butelio kakliuko įdėklas; Skirtukas (kartoninis); Skirtukas (plastikinis); Medžiaginis pamušalas; Poroloninis įdėklas; Formuotos celiuliozės įdėklas; Be įdėklo; Su popieriaus drožlėmis / užpildu; Padėklo formos įdėklas; Kita
th: กล่องของขวัญ/กล่องโลหะแบบใส่ด้านใน: ตัวรองคอขวด; ช่องแบ่ง (กระดาษแข็ง); ช่องแบ่ง (พลาสติก); บุกระดาษ/ผ้า; ถาดโฟม; ถาดกระดาษขึ้นรูป; ไม่มีถาดรอง; รวมกระดาษฝอย/วัสดุกันกระแทก; ถาดรอง; อื่นๆ
da: Indsatstype til gaveæske/metalæske: Indlæg til flaskehals; Rumdeler (pap); Rumdeler (plastik); Stofforing; Skumindlæg; Støbt papindlæg; Intet indlæg; Strimlet papir/fyld medfølger; Bakkeindlæg; Andet
ru: Тип вставки подарочной коробки/жестяной банки: Вставка для горлышка бутылки; Разделитель (картонный); Разделитель (пластиковый); Тканевая подкладка; Вставка из поролона; Вставка из формованной целлюлозы; Без вставки; С бумажной стружкой/наполнителем; Вставка-лоток; Другое
en: Gift box/tin insert type: Bottle neck insert; Divider (cardboard); Divider (plastic); Fabric lining; Foam insert; Molded pulp insert; No insert; Paper shred/filler included; Tray insert; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de berço para caixa/lata de presente: Encaixe de gargalo de garrafa; Divisória (papelão); Divisória (plástico); Forro de tecido; Encaixe de espuma; Encaixe de polpa moldada; Sem encaixe; Papel picado/enchimento incluído; Encaixe de bandeja; Outro
fr: Type d’insert pour boîte cadeau ou boîte métallique: Cale-col; Séparateur (carton); Séparateur (plastique); Doublure en tissu; Insert en mousse; Insert en pulpe moulée; Sans insert; Fibre de calage en papier/remplissage inclus; Insert en plateau; Autre
el: Τύπος εσωτερικού ενθέματος κουτιού δώρου/μεταλλικού κουτιού: Ένθετο για λαιμό μπουκαλιού; Διαχωριστικό (χαρτονένιο); Διαχωριστικό (πλαστικό); Υφασμάτινη επένδυση; Ένθετο αφρού; Ένθετο μορφοποιημένου χαρτοπολτού; Χωρίς ένθετο; Περιλαμβάνεται χαρτί κοπής/γέμισμα; Ένθετο δίσκου; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vložek za darilno škatlo/pločevinko: Vstavek za vrat steklenice; Pregrada (kartonasta); Pregrada (plastična); Podloga iz blaga; Vstavek iz pene; Vstavek iz oblikovane celuloze; Brez vstavka; Vključen papirni rezanec/polnilo; Vstavek v obliki pladnja; Drugo
it: tipo di scatola regali/codice fiscale: Inserto per collo di bottiglia; Divisorio (cartone); Divisorio (plastica); Fodera in tessuto; Inserto in schiuma; Inserto in polpa stampata; Nessun inserto; Carta triturata/riempitivo incluso; Vassoio a inserto; Altro
hu: Ajándékdoboz/dobozbetét típusa: Palacknyak-betét; Elválasztó (karton); Elválasztó (műanyag); Szövetbélés; Habbetét; Öntött papírpép betét; Nincs betét; Papírzúzalék/-kitöltő mellékelve; Tálcabetét; Egyéb
sv: Insatstyp för presentask/plåtask: Flaskhalsinsats; Avdelare (kartong); Avdelare (plast); Tygfoder; Skuminsats; Gjuten pappersinsats; Ingen insats; Pappersstrimlor/fyllning ingår; Brickinsats; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de inserție pentru cutie/cutie metalică de cadou: Suport pentru gâtul sticlei; Despărțitor (carton); Despărțitor (plastic); Căptușeală textilă; Suport din spumă; Suport din pastă modelată; Fără suport interior; Hârtie mărunțită/Material de umplutură inclus; Tăviță interioară; Altele
tr: Hediye kutusu/teneke kutu iç yerleştirme tipi: Şişe boynu eki; Bölücü (karton); Bölücü (plastik); Kumaş astar; Köpük ek; Kalıplanmış selüloz ek; Ek yok; Kırpık kağıt/dolgu dahil; Tepsi eki; Diğer
fi: Lahjarasian/‑purkin välikappaleen tyyppi: Pullonkaulan pidike; Jakaja (pahvi); Jakaja (muovi); Kangasvuori; Vaahtomuovisisäke; Muotoiltu massasisäke; Ei sisäkettä; Sisältää paperisilppua/täytettä; Tarjotinsisäke; Muu
pl: Typ wkładu pudełka/puszki prezentowej: Wkładka na szyjkę butelki; Przegroda (tekturowa); Przegroda (plastikowa); Wyściółka z materiału; Wkładka piankowa; Wkładka z pulpy formowanej; Brak wkładki; Wypełniacz papierowy w zestawie; Wkładka tackowa; Inny